Louisiana, session 2026, HB920.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1034.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1034.2. Drug manufacturer limitations on the pricing of GLP-1 medications for
health insurance plans; limit on cost-sharing requirement
A. As used in this Section, the following terms apply:
(1) "Drug formulary" or "formulary" has the same meaning as provided in
R.S. 22:1060.1.
(2) "Enrollee" or "insured" has the same meaning as provided in R.S.
22:1872.
(3) "Glucagon-Like Peptide-1" known as GLP-1 means a natural gut
hormone that helps control blood sugar, digestion, and appetite. GLP-1 medications
can be injectable or administered orally, whichever form of the drug is available.
(4) "Health coverage plan" has the same meaning as provided in R.S.
22:1034.1.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-178 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 920
B. Limitations on GLP-1 medications for drug manufacturers shall apply to
any health coverage plan for whom a provider issues a prescription, regardless of the
insured's specific medical condition or diagnosis.
(1) A health coverage plan shall not impose a cost-sharing provision for
GLP-1 medications in the health coverage plan's formulary if the total amount the
insured is required to pay exceeds two hundred dollars per prescription for a
thirty-day supply, regardless of the amount or type of GLP-1 medication needed to
fill the insured's prescription.
Section 2. Part IX of Chapter 5-E title 40 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 40:1259.11, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1259.11 GLP-1 medications; Medicaid coverage
A. The Louisiana Medicaid program shall make available to persons who are
eligible for Medicaid benefits under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C.
1396 et seq., coverage benefits for GLP-1 medications regardless of the enrollee's
specific medical condition or diagnosis, when a provider issues a prescription.
B. The Louisiana Department of Health may seek approval of a federal
Medicaid waiver and state plan amendments as may be necessary to implement the
provisions of this Section.